Massachusetts, session 194th, S1439.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3A of Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(d) Notwithstanding any general or special law, regulation, or policy to the contrary, the
requirements of this section shall not apply to any municipality categorized as an “Adjacent
Community” or an “Adjacent Small Town” without direct access to Massachusetts Bay
Transportation Authority service.
of 1